Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.070

Renewal of registration—Requirements, fees established by rule.

The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for renewal of registration. Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration and all privileges granted by the registration.

[ 1999 c 335 s 8.]